North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Right to Appraisal and Payment for Shares.
§ 55-13-02.
Right to appraisal.

In addition to any rights granted under Article 9 of this Chapter, a shareholder is entitled to appraisal rights and to obtain payment of the fair value of that shareholder’s shares, in the event of any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a merger to which the corporation is a party if either (i) shareholder approval is required for the merger by

G.S. 55-11-03

or would be required but for the provisions of

G.S. 55-11-03

(j), except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger or (ii) the corporation is a subsidiary and the merger is governed by

G.S. 55-11-04

or

G.S. 55-11-12

.

Consummation of a share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to any class or series of shares of the corporation that is not exchanged.

Consummation of a disposition of assets pursuant to

G.S. 55-12-02

.

An amendment of the articles of incorporation (i) with respect to a class or series of shares that reduces the number of shares of a class or series owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the corporation has an obligation or right to repurchase the fractional share so created or (ii) changes the corporation into a nonprofit corporation or cooperative organization.

Any other amendment to the articles of incorporation, merger, share exchange, or disposition of assets to the extent provided by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors.

Consummation of a conversion to a foreign corporation pursuant to Part 2 of Article 11A of this Chapter if the shareholder does not receive shares in the foreign corporation resulting from the conversion that (i) have terms as favorable to the shareholder in all material respects and (ii) represent at least the same percentage interest of the total voting rights of the outstanding shares of the corporation as the shares held by the shareholder before the conversion.

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to nonprofit status pursuant to Part 2 of Article 11A of this Chapter.

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to an unincorporated entity pursuant to Part 2 of Article 11A of this Chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the availability of appraisal rights under subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of this section shall be limited in accordance with the following provisions:

Appraisal rights shall not be available for the holders of shares of any class or series of shares that are any of the following:

A covered security under section 18(b)(1)(A) or (B) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.

Traded in an organized market and has at least 2,000 shareholders and a market value of at least twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) (exclusive of the value of shares held by the corporation’s subsidiaries, senior executives, directors, and beneficial shareholders owning more than ten percent (10%) of such shares).

Issued by an open-end management investment company registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and may be redeemed at the option of the holder at net asset value.

The applicability of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be determined as of (i) the record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of, and to vote at, the meeting of shareholders to act upon the corporate action requiring appraisal rights or, in the case of an offer made pursuant to G.S. 55-11-03(j), the date of the offer, or (ii) the day before the effective date of the corporate action if there is no meeting of shareholders and no offer made pursuant to G.S. 55-11-03(j).

Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for the holders of any class or series of shares who are required by the terms of the corporate action requiring appraisal rights to accept for such shares anything other than cash or shares of any class or any series of shares of any corporation, or any other proprietary interest of any other entity, that satisfies the standards set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection at the time the corporate action becomes effective.

Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for the holders of any class or series of shares where the corporate action is an interested transaction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the articles of incorporation as originally filed or any amendment to the articles may limit or eliminate appraisal rights for any class or series of preferred shares with respect to any corporate action, except that (i) no limitation or elimination shall be effective if the class or series does not have the right to vote separately as a voting group, alone or as part of a group, on the corporate action or if the corporate action is an amendment to the articles of incorporation that changes the corporation into a nonprofit corporation or a cooperative organization, and (ii) any limitation or elimination contained in an amendment to the articles of incorporation that limits or eliminates appraisal rights for any shares that are outstanding immediately prior to the effective date of the amendment, or that the corporation is or may be required to issue or sell thereafter pursuant to any conversion, exchange, or other right existing immediately before the effective date of the amendment, shall not apply to any corporate action that becomes effective within one year of that date if the corporate action would otherwise afford appraisal rights.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-45, s. 25, effective October 1, 2018.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; c. 235; 1929, c. 269; 1939, c. 279; 1943, c. 270; G.S., ss. 55-26, 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 30, 31; 1969, c. 751, ss. 36, 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; c. 476, s. 193; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.18; 1991, c. 645, s. 12; 1997-202, s. 1; 1999-141, s. 1; 2001-387, s. 26; 2003-157, s. 1; 2011-347, ss. 1, 22(c); 2018-45, s. 25.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Transactions Requiring Appraisal Rights

A merger pursuant to section 11.04 or a short-form merger pursuant to section 11.05. Holders of any class or series that is to be exchanged or converted in connection with a merger under section 11.04 are entitled both to a vote under section 11.04(f) and to appraisal under section 13.02(a)(1). Although shareholders of a subsidiary that is a party to a merger under section 11.05 are not entitled to a vote, they are entitled to appraisal under 13.02(a)(1) because their interests will be extinguished by the merger. Section 13.02(a)(1)(i) denies appraisal rights to any class or series of shares in the surviving corporation if such class or series remains outstanding.

A share exchange under section 11.03 if the corporation is a party whose shares are being acquired in the exchange. Consistent with the treatment in section 13.02(a)(1) of mergers requiring shareholder approval, subsection (2) provides appraisal only for those shares that will be exchanged.

A disposition of assets requiring shareholder approval under section 12.02. Minimally, shareholders of all classes or series of the corporation that are generally entitled to vote on matters requiring shareholder approval will be entitled to assert appraisal rights. Whether shares of a class or series that do not have general voting rights will be entitled to vote on the asset disposition and thus become entitled to appraisal rights depends on the form of the transaction disposing of the corporation’s assets. In the usual form of this transaction, which is governed by chapter 12, the acquirer purchases substantially all of the assets and assumes substantially all of the liabilities of the corporation, which then liquidates pursuant to a plan of dissolution approved by the shareholders as part of the transaction and distributes the consideration received from the acquirer to its shareholders. If the transaction provides a non-voting class of preferred with its liquidation preference, there is no change in the contractual terms of the preferred and it is entitled neither to vote nor to appraisal rights. By the same token, a preferred class cannot be required to accept any consideration different from that called for in its liquidation preference without amending the terms of the class. For example, a plan that called for the preferred to accept securities of the acquirer in lieu of its cash liquidation preference would trigger both group voting and appraisal rights on behalf of the class. In the unusual event that the asset disposition plan contemplated that the corporation would continue in existence, the terms of a nonvoting class would not have been changed as a result of the transaction, and appraisal rights would not be available. As provided in section 12.02(g), a disposition of assets by a corporation in the course of dissolution under chapter 14 is governed by that chapter, not chapter 12, and thus does not implicate appraisal rights.

Amendments to the articles of incorporation that effectuate a reverse stock split which reduces the number of shares that a shareholder owns of a class or series to a fractional share if the corporation has the obligation or right to repurchase the fractional share so created. The reasons for granting appraisal rights in this situation are similar to those granting such rights in cases of cash-out mergers, as both transactions could compel affected shareholders to accept cash for their investment in an amount established by the corporation. Appraisal is afforded only for those shareholders of a class or series whose interest is so affected.

Any other merger, share exchange, disposition of assets or amendment to the articles to the extent the articles, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors grants appraisal rights to a particular class or series of stock. A corporation may voluntarily wish to grant to the holders of one or more of its classes or series of shares appraisal rights in connection with these important transactions whenever the Act does not provide statutory appraisal rights. The grant of appraisal rights may satisfy shareholders who might, in the absence of appraisal rights, seek other remedies. Moreover, in situations where the existence of appraisal rights may otherwise be disputed, the voluntary offer of those rights under this section may avoid litigation. Obviously, an express grant of voluntary appraisal rights under section 13.02(a)(5) is intended to override any of the exceptions to the availability of appraisal rights in section 13.02(a). Any voluntary grant of appraisal rights by the corporation to the holders of one or more of its classes or series of shares will thereby automatically make all of the provisions of chapter 13 applicable to the corporation and such holders regarding this corporate action.

A domestication in which the shares held by a shareholder are reclassified in a manner that results in the shareholder holding shares either with terms that are not as favorable in all materials respects or representing a smaller percentage of the total outstanding voting rights in the corporation as those held before the domestication. Appraisal rights are not provided if the shares of a shareholder are otherwise reclassified so long as the foregoing restrictions are satisfied.

A conversion to nonprofit status pursuant to subchapter 9C. Such a conversion involves such a fundamental change in the nature of the corporation that appraisal rights are provided to all of the shareholders.

A conversion of the corporation to an unincorporated entity pursuant to subchapter 9E. As with the previous type of transaction, this form of conversion is so fundamental that appraisal rights are provided to all of the shareholders.

Market Exception to Appraisal Rights

Appraisal Rights in Conflict Transactions

Elimination of Appraisal Rights for Preferred Shares

Exclusivity of Appraisal Rights

Section 13.02(a) establishes the scope of appraisal rights by identifying those transactions which afford this right. In view of the significant degree of private ordering permitted by section 13.02(a)(5), the scope of statutory appraisal provided is somewhat narrower than that provided in the 1984 Model Act. As discussed in the first section of the Official Comment to section 13.01, statutory appraisal is made available only for corporate actions that will result in a fundamental change in the shares to be affected by the action and then only when uncertainty concerning the fair value of the affected shares may cause reasonable differences about the fairness of the terms of the corporate action. The transactions that satisfy both of these criteria are:

Chapter 13 provides a limited exception to appraisal rights for those situations where shareholders can either accept the consideration offered in the appraisal-triggering transaction or can obtain the fair value of their shares by selling them in the market. This provision is predicated on the theory that where an efficient market exists, the market price will be an adequate proxy for the fair value of the corporation’s shares, thus making appraisal unnecessary. Furthermore, after the corporation announces an appraisal-triggering action, the market operates at maximum efficiency with respect to that corporation’s shares because interested parties and market professionals evaluate the offer and competing offers may be generated if the original offer is deemed inadequate.

Moreover, the market exception reflects an evaluation that the uncertainty, costs and time commitment involved in any appraisal proceeding are not warranted where shareholders can sell their shares in an efficient, fair and liquid market. For these reasons, approximately half of the states have enacted market exceptions to their appraisal statutes.

For purposes of this chapter, the market exception is provided for a class or series if two criteria are met: the market in which the class or series is traded must be “liquid” and the value of the shares established by the appraisal-triggering event must be “reliable.” Liquidity is defined in section 13.02(b)(1) and requires the class or series of stock to satisfy either of two requirements: the class or series is either listed on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange or is designated as a national market system security on an interdealer quotation system by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.; or, although not so listed or designated, the class or series has at least 2,000 record or beneficial shareholders, provided that using both concepts does not result in duplication. In this instance, the outstanding class or series must also have a market value of at least $20 million, excluding the value of shares held by the corporation’s subsidiaries, senior executives, directors and beneficial shareholders owning more than 10 percent of the class or series.

Because section 13.02(b)(3) excludes from the market exception those transactions that require shareholders to accept anything other than cash or securities that also meet the liquidity tests of section 13.02(b)(1), shareholders are assured of receiving either appraisal rights, cash from the transaction, or shares or other proprietary interests in the survivor entity that are liquid. Section 13.02(b)(2) provides that the corporation generally must satisfy the requirements of section 13.02(b)(1) on the record date for a shareholder vote on the appraisal-triggering transaction. For purposes of subsection 13.02(a)(1)(ii), the requirements of section 13.02(b)(1) must be met as of the day before the corporate action becomes effective.

The premise of the market exception is that the market must be liquid and the valuation assigned to the relevant shares must be “reliable.” Section 13.02(b)(1) is designed to assure liquidity. For purposes of these provisions, section 13.02(b)(4) is designed to assure reliability by recognizing that the market price of, or consideration for, shares of a corporation that proposes to engage in a section 13.02(a) transaction may be subject to influences where a corporation’s management, controlling shareholders or directors have conflicting interests that could, if not dealt with appropriately, adversely affect the consideration that otherwise could have been expected. Section 13.02(b)(4) addresses two groups of conflict transactions: those in clause (i), which involve controlling shareholders; and those in clause (ii), which involve senior executives and directors.

Section 13.02(b)(4)(i) covers two possible conflict situations: subsection (A) covers the acquisition or exchange of shares or assets of the corporation by a shareholder or an affiliate of the shareholder that could be considered controlling by virtue of ownership of a substantial amount of voting stock (20 percent); and subsection (B) covers the acquisition or exchange of shares or assets of the corporation by an individual or group, or by an affiliate of such individual or group, that has the ability to exercise control, through contract, stock ownership, or some other means, over at least one fourth of the board’s membership. The definition of “beneficial owner” in section 13.02(b)(5) serves to identify possible conflict situations by deeming each member of a group that agrees to vote in tandem to be a beneficial owner of all the voting shares owned by the group. In contrast, the term “beneficial shareholder,” as defined in section 13.01(2), is used to identify those persons entitled to appraisal rights. The last portion of subsection (A) recognizes that an acquisition effected in two steps (a tender offer followed by a merger) within one year, where the two steps are either on the same terms or the second step is on terms that are more favorable to target shareholders, is properly considered a single transaction for purposes of identifying conflict transactions, regardless of whether the second-step merger is governed by sections 11.04 or 11.05.

Section 13.02(b)(4)(ii) covers the acquisition or exchange of shares or assets of the corporation by a person, or an affiliate of a person, who is, or in the year leading up to the transaction was, a senior executive or director of the corporation. The section eliminates the market exception for management buyouts because participation in the buyout group is itself “a financial benefit not available to other shareholders as such.” The market exception is also not available for transactions involving other types of economic benefits (in addition to benefits afforded to shareholders generally, as such) afforded to senior executives (as defined in section 13.01(8)) and directors in specified conflict situations, unless specific objective or procedural standards are met. Section 13.01(1) specially defines the term “affiliate” for purposes of section 13.02(b)(4) to include an entity of which a person is a senior executive. Due to this specialized definition, if a senior executive of the corporation is to continue and is to receive enumerated employment and other financial benefits after the transaction, the availability of the market exception will depend on meeting one of the three conditions specified in clauses (A), (B) and (C) of section 13.02(b)(4)(ii).

First, under section 13.02(b)(4)(ii)(A), the market exception is not lost if financial benefits that result from the transaction consist of employment, consulting, retirement or similar benefits established separately and not in contemplation of the transaction. For example, if an individual has an arrangement under which benefits will be triggered on a “change of control,” such as accelerated vesting of options, retirement benefits, deferred compensation and similar items, or is afforded the opportunity to retire or leave the employ of the enterprise with more favorable economic results than would be the case absent a change of control, the existence of these arrangements would not disqualify the transaction from the market exception if the arrangements had been established as a general condition of the individual’s employment or continued employment, rather than in contemplation of the particular transaction. Second, under section 13.02(b)(4)(ii)(B), if such arrangements are established as part of, or as a condition of, the transaction, the market exception will not be lost if the arrangements are either not more favorable than those already in existence or, if more favorable, are approved by “qualified” directors (
i.e.
, meeting the standard of independence specified in section 8.62(d)), in the same manner as is provided for conflicting interest transactions generally with the corporation under section 8.62. This category would include arrangements with the corporation which have been negotiated as part of, or as a condition of, the transaction or arrangements with the acquiring company or one or more of its other subsidiaries. The third situation, delineated in section 13.02(b)(4)(ii)(C), addresses a person who is a director of the issuer and, in connection with the transaction, is to become a director of the acquiring entity or its parent, or to continue as a director of the corporation when it becomes a subsidiary of the acquiring entity. In this situation, the market exception is not lost as long as that person will not be treated more favorably as a director than are other persons who are serving in the same director positions.

Section 13.02(c) permits the corporation to eliminate or limit appraisal rights for the holders of one or more series or classes of preferred shares. The operative provisions may be set forth in the corporation’s articles of incorporation as originally filed or in any amendment thereto, but any such amendment will not become effective for one year with respect to outstanding shares or shares which the corporation is or may be required to issue or sell at some later date pursuant to any rights outstanding prior to such amendment becoming effective. Shareholders who have not yet acquired, or do not have a right to acquire from the corporation, any shares of preferred stock, should have the ability either not to acquire any shares of preferred stock or to have appraisal rights granted or restored for such shares, if such shareholders so desire, before purchasing them. In contrast, because the terms of common shares are rarely negotiated, section 13.02 does not permit the corporation to eliminate or limit the appraisal rights of common shares.

With two exceptions, section 13.02(d) provides that the appraisal is the exclusive remedy for corporate action that has been completed. The theory underlying this section is that when a majority of shareholders has approved a corporate change, the corporation should be permitted to proceed even if a minority considers the change unwise or disadvantageous. The very existence of the appraisal remedy recognizes that shareholders may disagree about the value of consequences of a corporate action and that some may hold such strong views that they will want to vindicate them in a judicial proceeding. Since a judicial proceeding is insulated from the dynamics of an actual negotiation, it is not surprising that the two processes could produce different valuations. Accordingly, if such a proceeding results in an award of additional consideration to the shareholders who pursued appraisal, no inference should be drawn that the judgment of the majority was wrong or that compensation is now owed to shareholders who did not seek appraisal. Thus, an exclusivity principle is generally justified. Nevertheless, there may be exceptional circumstances where the process by which the corporate action was approved was so flawed that it is appropriate to provide more general relief on behalf of all affected shareholders. Thus, section 13.02(d)(1) does not preclude challenges to serious procedural defects in approving the action, such as a failure to obtain the votes required by statute or by the corporation’s own articles, bylaws, or board resolution authorizing the transaction. Similarly, subsection (2) creates an exception for cases where fraud or material misrepresentation have affected the shareholder vote to such an extent as to have caused the corporate action to be approved mistakenly. The concept of misrepresentation includes the omission of a material fact necessary to make statements made not misleading.

Although section 13.02(d) does not address the question of remedies, such as injunctive relief, that may be available before the corporate action is effected, it should be noted that a complaint based solely on adequacy of consideration is not actionable unless accompanied by credible allegations of wrongdoing. Section 13.02(d) is concerned with challenges only to the corporate action and does not address remedies, if any, that shareholders may have against directors or other persons as a result of the corporate action. See section 8.31 and Official Comment.

Amended North Carolina Commentary

Subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3) give a right of dissent for all shares, whether voting or nonvoting, in the case of a merger or sale or exchange of assets; the corresponding provisions in the Model Act give the right of dissent only to voting shareholders.

The right of dissent under this section, however, does not apply in a merger to shares of a corporation when approval by the shareholders of that corporation is not required under G.S. 55-11-03(g) or to shares of a parent corporation in a merger under

G.S. 55-11-04

. In addition, the right of dissent does not apply in a merger or share exchange to shares that are redeemable by the corporation at the time of the transaction at a price not greater than the cash to be received in exchange for such shares. The Model Act was modified in clause (i) of subdivision (a)(1) to clarify that the absence of a right of dissent applies only to the shares of the corporation covered by G.S. 55-11-03(g) and not to shares of a corporation if approval by its shareholders is required.

The Model Act was also modified in subdivision (a)(3) to provide that a right of dissent will not be available if the sale of property is pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale will be distributed in cash to the shareholders within one year after the date of the sale. This is different from the Model Act, which requires the sale itself to be in cash. This subdivision thus allows more flexibility in permitting, for example, the sale to be for promissory notes or other property that will be converted to cash for distribution within the one-year period.

The language of the Model Act which excepts from the operation of the section “a limitation by dilution through issuance of shares or other securities with similar voting rights” was eliminated from the end of clause (iv) of subdivision (a)(4). The only reason for this elimination was the drafters’ opinion that the language is unnecessary; if it were necessary, it should also have been added to the end of G.S. 55-10-04(a)(4).

Clause (vi) of subdivision (a)(4), which is not in the Model Act, brings forward the same provisions in former G.S. 55-101(b). However, the drafters decided not to bring forward the unusual provision in former G.S. 55-102(a) that gave a right of dissent to the holders of any class of preferred shares with dividend arrearages if the corporation offered to exchange such shares for shares with a prior preference and that offer was accepted by any of the preferred shareholders. Such a situation may be covered by clause (i) of subdivision (a)(4).

The introductory language of subsection 13.02(a) of the Model Act was modified to provide that the rights provided by this section are in addition to any rights provided by Article 9.

By making the appraisal remedy exclusive unless the transaction is “unlawful” or “fraudulent,” subsection (b) effects a change from former G.S. 55-113(b), which provided that such remedy was “in addition to any other right [the shareholder] may have in law or in equity.”

Language was added to the Model Act provision to make it clear that subsection (b) covers a cash merger and that, in determining whether a merger was “unlawful” or “fraudulent,” the same standard applies, regardless of whether the consideration received was cash, other property, or shares of a surviving corporation.

SUPPLEMENTAL NORTH CAROLINA COMMENTARY (2011)

Effective October 1, 2011, this section was amended to limit appraisal rights under subdivision (a)(1), (2) and (3) to voting shares in the case of a merger or share exchange or sale of assets.
The prior statute gave a right of appraisal for all shares, whether voting or non-voting, in such transactions.
Subdivision (d), which is not in the Model Act, grandfathers the appraisal rights of a shareholder holding shares of a class or series that were issued and outstanding as of the effective date of the Act but that did not as of that date entitle the shareholder to vote on a corporate action described in subdivision (a)(1), (2) or (3) of this section; such shareholder shall be entitled to appraisal rights to the same extent as if such shares did entitle the shareholder to vote on such corporate action.

Corporations are afforded flexibility under Article 13 to deviate from the specified corporate actions that give rise to appraisal rights and the shareholders entitled to such rights.
Under subdivision (a)(5) appraisal rights can be extended to any shareholders in connection with any amendment to the articles of incorporation, merger, share exchange or disposition of assets to the extent provided in the articles, bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors.

Supplemental North Carolina Commentary (2018)

Effective as of October 1, 2018, this section was amended to provide appraisal rights to voting and non-voting shareholders on an equal basis, including (i) to minority shareholders of a subsidiary corporation in a short-form merger with an unincorporated parent company under

G.S. 55-11-12

, and (ii) to non-tendering shareholders in second-step mergers following a tender offer in which offeror gains control under G.S. 55-11-03(j).

§ 55-13-03.
Assertion of rights by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the record shareholder’s name but owned by a beneficial shareholder only if the record shareholder (i) objects with respect to all shares of the class or series owned by the beneficial shareholder and (ii) notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each beneficial shareholder on whose behalf appraisal rights are being asserted. The rights of a record shareholder who asserts appraisal rights for only part of the shares held of record in the record shareholder’s name under this subsection shall be determined as if the shares as to which the record shareholder objects and the record shareholder’s other shares were registered in the names of different record shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to shares of any class or series held on behalf of the shareholder only if the shareholder does both of the following:

Submits to the corporation the record shareholder’s written consent to the assertion of rights no later than the date referred to in G.S. 55-13-22(b)(2)b.

Submits written consent under subdivision (1) of this subsection with respect to all shares of the class or series that are beneficially owned by the beneficial shareholder.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2011-347, s. 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.03 addresses the relationship between those who are entitled to assert appraisal rights and the widespread practice of nominee or street name ownership of publicly-held shares. Generally, a shareholder must demand appraisal for all the shares of a class or series which the shareholder owns. If a record shareholder is a nominee for several beneficial shareholders, some of whom wish to demand appraisal and some of whom do not, section 13.03(a) permits the record shareholder to assert appraisal rights with respect to a portion of the shares held of record by the record shareholder but only with respect to all the shares beneficially owned by a single person. This limitation is necessary to prevent abuse by a single beneficial shareholder who is not fundamentally opposed to the proposed corporate action but who may wish to speculate on the appraisal process, as to some of that shareholder’s shares, on the possibility of a high payment. On the other hand, a shareholder who owns shares in more than one class or series may assert appraisal rights for only some but not all classes or series that the shareholder owns. This is permitted because fair treatment of one class or series does not guarantee fair treatment of other classes or series.

Section 13.03(a) also requires a record shareholder who demands appraisal with respect to a portion of the shares held by the record shareholder to notify the corporation of the name and address of the beneficial owner on whose behalf the record shareholder has demanded appraisal rights.

Section 13.03(b) permits a beneficial shareholder to assert appraisal rights directly if the beneficial shareholder submits the record shareholder’s written consent. Although generally the record shareholder is treated as the owner of shares, this section recognizes that sometimes the record shareholders are holding shares on behalf of beneficial shareholders. It would be foreign to the premises underlying nominee and street name ownership to require these record shareholders to forward demands and participate in litigation on behalf of their clients. In order to make appraisal rights effective without burdening record shareholders, beneficial shareholders should be allowed to assert their own claims as provided in this subsection. The beneficial shareholder is required to submit, no later than the date specified in section 13.22(b)(2)(ii), a written consent by the record shareholder to the assertion of appraisal rights to verify the beneficial shareholder’s entitlement and to permit the protection of any security interest in the shares. In practice, a broker’s customer who wishes to assert appraisal rights may request the broker to supply the customer with the name of the record shareholder (which may be a house nominee or a nominee of the Depository Trust Company), and a form of consent signed by the record shareholder. At the same time, the customer may want to obtain certificates for the shares so that they may be deposited pursuant to section 13.23. After the corporation has received the form of consent, the corporation must deal with the beneficial shareholder.

North Carolina Commentary

The drafters did not include the language at the end of subsection 13.03(b)(3) of the Model Act requiring a beneficial owner to dissent with respect to all shares “over which he has power to direct the vote” because they concluded that it could be construed to include shares which that person did not own either as beneficial or record holder but for which he or she was a proxy or could exercise a power of attorney. That result was not deemed desirable.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, rewrote the section catchline, which formerly read: “Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners”; and rewrote the section.

§§ 55-13-04 through 55-13-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.